California, session 20252026, AB2593.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2654 is added to the Penal Code, to read:2654. (a) A supervisor, administrator, or employee of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall not knowingly countermand, change, interfere with with, or refuse to implement health care prescribed or determined to be medically necessary by a licensed health care provider acting within the scope of their licensure that results in substantial emotional distress or serious bodily injury.(b) For purposes of this section, “serious bodily injury” means a serious impairment of physical condition, including, but not limited to, the following: loss of consciousness; concussion; bone fracture; protracted loss or impairment of function of any bodily member or organ; a wound requiring extensive suturing; and serious disfigurement. the following terms have the following meanings:(1) “Serious bodily injury” means a medically diagnosed serious impairment of physical condition, including, but not limited to, acute or protracted loss or impairment of function of any bodily member or organ.(2) “Substantial emotional distress” means medically or psychiatrically diagnosed mental or emotional suffering that is acute, chronic, or protracted, or a condition that requires inpatient psychiatric treatment.